District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.25

Charge against District for care of convicts.

The cost of the care and custody of District of Columbia convicts in any federal penitentiary shall be charged against the District of Columbia in quarterly accounts to be rendered by the disbursing officer of said penitentiary; and the amount to be charged against the District of Columbia shall be ascertained by multiplying the average daily number of District of Columbia convicts confined in the penitentiary during the quarter by the per capita cost for all prisoners in such penitentiary for the same quarter but excluding expenses of construction or extraordinary repair of buildings.

Mar. 3, 1915, 38 Stat. 869, ch. 75, § 1
1981 Ed., § 24-424.
1973 Ed., § 24-424.